apertium-id-ms.ms.dix
    <pardef n="kepejuangannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kependiaman-kependiaman__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kependiaman-kependiamannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kependiaman__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kependiamannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kebakaran-kebakaran__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kebakaran-kebakarannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kebakaran__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kebakarannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ketertinggalan-ketertinggalan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ketertinggalan-ketertinggalannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ketertinggalan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ketertinggalannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegadaian-pegadaian__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegadaian-pegadaiannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegadaian__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegadaiannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejabat-pejabat__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejabat-pejabatnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejabat__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pejabatnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penarikan-penarikan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penarikan-penarikannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penarikan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penarikannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penulis-penulis__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penulis-penulisnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penulis__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penulisnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="permainan-permainan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="permainan-permainannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="permainan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="permainannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perenang-perenang__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perenang-perenangnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perenang__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perenangnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacaan-bacaan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacaan-bacaannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacaan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacaannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tertidur__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ter"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="pasuk"><p><l>pasukan-pasukan</l><r>pasuk</r></p><par n="bacaan-bacaan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pusing"><p><l>pusingan</l><r>pusing</r></p><par n="bacaan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pasuk"><p><l>pasukannya</l><r>pasuk</r></p><par n="bacaannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jadi"><p><l>kejadian-kejadian</l><r>jadi</r></p><par n="kebakaran-kebakaran__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="putus"><p><l>keputusan-keputusan</l><r>putus</r></p><par n="kebakaran-kebakaran__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hidup"><p><l>kehidupan</l><r>hidup</r></p><par n="kebakaran__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="muncul"><p><l>kemunculan</l><r>muncul</r></p><par n="kebakaran__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gagal"><p><l>kegagalannya</l><r>gagal</r></p><par n="kebakarannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lahir"><p><l>kelahirannya</l><r>lahir</r></p><par n="kebakarannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pimpin"><p><l>kepemimpinan</l><r>pimpin</r></p><par n="kependiaman__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pimpin"><p><l>kepemimpinannya</l><r>pimpin</r></p><par n="kependiamannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lalu"><p><l>keterlaluan</l><r>lalu</r></p><par n="ketertinggalan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="libat"><p><l>keterlibatan</l><r>libat</r></p><par n="ketertinggalan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="libat"><p><l>keterlibatannya</l><r>libat</r></p><par n="ketertinggalannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="larang"><p><l>pelarangan</l><r>larang</r></p><par n="pegadaian__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="musnah"><p><l>pemusnahan</l><r>musnah</r></p><par n="pegadaian__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lantik"><p><l>pelantikannya</l><r>lantik</r></p><par n="pegadaiannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jabat"><p><l>pejabat-pejabat</l><r>jabat</r></p><par n="pejabat-pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="main"><p><l>pemain-pemain</l><r>main</r></p><par n="pejabat-pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="latih"><p><l>pelatih</l><r>latih</r></p><par n="pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="luncur"><p><l>peluncur</l><r>luncur</r></p><par n="pejabat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="main"><p><l>pemainnya</l><r>main</r></p><par n="pejabatnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saing"><p><l>pesaingnya</l><r>saing</r></p><par n="pejabatnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="temu"><p><l>penemuan-penemuan</l><r>temu</r></p><par n="penarikan-penarikan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kibar"><p><l>pengibaran</l><r>kibar</r></p><par n="penarikan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tindas"><p><l>penindasan</l><r>tindas</r></p><par n="penarikan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="capai"><p><l>pencapaiannya</l><r>capai</r></p><par n="penarikannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="keluar"><p><l>pengeluarannya</l><r>keluar</r></p><par n="penarikannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gubah"><p><l>penggubah-penggubah</l><r>gubah</r></p><par n="penulis-penulis__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pimpin"><p><l>pemimpin-pemimpin</l><r>pimpin</r></p><par n="penulis-penulis__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ikut"><p><l>pengikut-pengikutnya</l><r>ikut</r></p><par n="penulis-penulisnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="duduk"><p><l>penduduk</l><r>duduk</r></p><par n="penulis__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sambung"><p><l>penyambung</l><r>sambung</r></p><par n="penulis__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="duduk"><p><l>penduduknya</l><r>duduk</r></p><par n="penulisnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tonton"><p><l>penontonnya</l><r>tonton</r></p><par n="penulisnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rompak"><p><l>perompak</l><r>rompak</r></p><par n="perenang__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tempur"><p><l>pertempuran-pertempuran</l><r>tempur</r></p><par n="permainan-permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ubah"><p><l>perubahan-perubahan</l><r>ubah</r></p><par n="permainan-permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hitung"><p><l>perhitungan</l><r>hitung</r></p><par n="permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sembunyi"><p><l>persembunyian</l><r>sembunyi</r></p><par n="permainan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kembang"><p><l>perkembangannya</l><r>kembang</r></p><par n="permainannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="minta"><p><l>permintaannya</l><r>minta</r></p><par n="permainannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sembunyi"><p><l>tersembunyi</l><r>sembunyi</r></p><par n="tertidur__vblex"/></e>
